Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 2.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20102-3234.03
Trails; terms, defined.

For purposes of
sections 2-3234.02 to 2-3234.09:

(1) District means a
natural resources district;

(2) Private real property does not include
any public land such as real property under the general management of the
Board of Educational Lands and Funds;

(3) Supermajority means sixty-seven percent or more;
and

(4)
Trail means a thoroughfare or track across real property used for recreational
purposes.

Laws 2010, LB1010, § 2.